New York, session 2025-2026, S8247.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 15 of section 202 of the elder law, as amended 2 by section 1 of subpart J of part XX of chapter 55 of the laws of 2020, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 15. to periodically, in consultation with the state [director] commis- 5 sioner of veterans' services, review the programs operated by the office 6 to ensure that the needs of the state's aging veteran population are 7 being met and to develop improvements to programs to meet such needs; 8 § 2. Subdivision (i) of section 19.07 of the mental hygiene law, as 9 amended by section 31-a of part AA of chapter 56 of the laws of 2019, is 10 amended to read as follows: 11 (i) The office of [alcoholism and substance abuse services] addiction 12 services and supports shall periodically, in consultation with the state 13 [director] commissioner of veterans' services: (1) review the programs 14 operated by the office to ensure that the needs of the state's veterans 15 who served in the U.S. armed forces and who are recovering from alcohol 16 and/or substance abuse are being met and to develop improvements to 17 programs to meet such needs; and (2) in collaboration with the state 18 [director] commissioner of veterans' services and the commissioner of 19 the office of mental health, review and make recommendations to improve 20 programs that provide treatment, rehabilitation, relapse prevention, and 21 recovery services to veterans who have served in a combat theatre or 22 combat zone of operations and have a co-occurring mental health and 23 alcoholism or substance abuse disorder. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13160-01-5 S. 8247 2 1 § 3. Subdivisions 1 and 5 of section 99-v of the state finance law, as 2 amended by section 17 of part AA of chapter 56 of the laws of 2019, are 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. There is hereby established in the joint custody of the commission- 5 er of taxation and finance, the New York state [director] commissioner 6 of veterans' services and the comptroller, a special fund to be known as 7 the "homeless veterans assistance fund". 8 5. Moneys shall be paid out of the fund on the audit and warrant of 9 the comptroller on vouchers approved and certified by the New York state 10 [director] commissioner of veterans' services. Any interest received by 11 the comptroller on moneys on deposit in the homeless veterans assistance 12 fund shall be retained in and become part of such fund. 13 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.